Utah statutes.
11-30-4.   Hearing on petition.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall issue an order in the form of a notice against all defendants requiring them to appear at a time and place to be designated in the order, and to show cause why the prayers of the petition should not be granted.  The time of the hearing shall be not less than 20 nor more than 30 days from the date of the issuing of the order.  The place of the hearing shall be within the county in which the petition is filed.  The order shall set forth a general description of the petition but need not set forth the entire petition or any attached exhibits.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 1987 General Session

